apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="আগ/া__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিলাম</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pcnd" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়ে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ppst" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ান</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকব</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াব</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিলাম</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ান</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াস</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াই</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিলি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ানো</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ger" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>া</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াত</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিস</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াও</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিলেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিলে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছ</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিস</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াক</l>

    <e lm="আগা">
      <i>আগ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বেরা">
      <i>বের</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পৌঁছা">
      <i>পৌঁছ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জড়া">
      <i>জড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নাড়া">
      <i>নাড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চালা">
      <i>চাল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ফিরা">
      <i>ফির</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ছড়া">
      <i>ছড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ফলা">
      <i>ফল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গলা">
      <i>গল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="রটা">
      <i>রট</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="হারা">
      <i>হার</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পিছা">
      <i>পিছ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পাকা">
      <i>পাক</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দাঁড়া">
      <i>দাঁড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মানা">
      <i>মান</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দৌড়া">
      <i>দৌড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কাটা">
      <i>কাট</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চুলকা">
      <i>চুলক</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সরা">
      <i>সর</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কমা">
      <i>কম</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কামড়া">
      <i>কামড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাড়া">
      <i>বাড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="লাফা">
      <i>লাফ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঘুমা">
      <i>ঘুম</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চাপা">
      <i>চাপ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাঁকা">
      <i>বাঁক</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জানা">
      <i>জান</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বদলা">
      <i>বদল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="লাগা">
      <i>লাগ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পাঠা">
      <i>পাঠ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চিবা">
      <i>চিব</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঘটা">
      <i>ঘট</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দেখা">
      <i>দেখ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আনা">
      <i>আন</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বেড়া">
      <i>বেড়</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সাজা">
      <i>সাজ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চেঁচা">
      <i>চেঁচ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পালা">
      <i>পাল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পৌছা">
      <i>পৌছ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঠকা">
      <i>ঠক</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কচলা">
      <i>কচল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জ্বালা">
      <i>জ্বাল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভাঙ্গা">
      <i>ভাঙ্গ</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="করা">
      <i>কর</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঝালা">
      <i>ঝাল</i>
      <par n="আগ/া__vblex" />
    </e>
